Ohio, session 136, HB394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3333.27 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3333.27. (A) As used in this section: 6
(1) "Eligible institution" means a nonprofit Ohio 7
institution of higher education that holds a certificate of 8
authorization issued under section 1713.02 of the Revised Code 9
and meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act 10
of 1964. 11
(2) "Resident" and "full-time student" have the same 12
meanings as those adopted by the chancellor of higher education 13
under section 3333.122 of the Revised Code. 14
(3) "State university" has the same meaning as under 15
section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. 16
(B) The chancellor of higher education shall establish and 17

H. B. No. 394 Page 2
As Introduced
administer a student choice grant program and adopt rules for 18
the administration of the program. 19
(C) The chancellor may make a grant to any resident of 20
this state who meets the following requirements: 21
(1) The applicant has been a resident of Ohio for at least 22
two years prior to application for the grant. 23
(2) The applicant is enrolled as a full-time student in a 24
bachelor's degree program at an eligible institution. 25
(3) The applicant maintains an academic record that meets 26
or exceeds the standard established pursuant to this section by 27
rule of the chancellor. 28
No grant shall be made to any individual who was enrolled 29
as a student in an institution of higher education on or before 30
July 1, 2026, or is serving a term of imprisonment. 31
(D) The grant shall not exceed the lesser of the total 32
instructional and general charges of the institution in which 33
the student is enrolled, or an amount equal to one-fourth of the 34
total of any state instructional subsidy amount distributed by 35
the chancellor in the second fiscal year of the preceding 36
biennium for all full-time students enrolled in bachelor's 37
degree programs at a state university divided by the sum of the 38
actual number of full-time students enrolled in bachelor's 39
degree programs at a state university reported to the chancellor 40
for such year by the institutions to which the subsidy was 41
distributed. 42
(E) The chancellor shall prescribe the form and manner of 43
application for grants, including the manner by which eligible 44
institutions certify that each applicant from such institution 45
is enrolled in a bachelor's degree program as a full-time 46

H. B. No. 394 Page 3
As Introduced
student and has an academic record that meets or exceeds the 47
standard established by the chancellor. 48
(F) A grant awarded to an eligible student shall be paid 49
to the institution in which the student is enrolled, and the 50
institution shall reduce the student's instructional and general 51
charges by the amount of the grant. 52
(G) Each grant awarded shall be prorated and paid in equal 53
installments at the time of enrollment for each term of the 54
academic year for which the grant is awarded. No student is 55
eligible to receive a grant for more than ten semesters, fifteen 56
quarters, or the equivalent of five academic years. 57
(H) The receipt of an Ohio student choice grant shall not 58
affect a student's eligibility for assistance, or the amount of 59
that assistance, granted under section 3315.33, 3333.122, 60
3333.125, 3333.126, 3333.127, 3333.128, 3333.129, 3333.21, 61
3333.24, 3333.26, 3333.28, 3333.372, 3333.391, 3333.393, 62
3333.421, 3333.61, 5910.03, 5910.031, 5910.032, or 5919.34 of 63
the Revised Code. If a student receives assistance under one or 64
more of those sections, the student choice grant made to the 65
student shall not exceed the difference between the total 66
instructional and general charges of the institution in which 67
the student is enrolled and the amount of assistance received 68
under those sections. 69
(I) The general assembly shall support the student choice 70
grant program by such sums and in such manner as it may provide, 71
but the chancellor may also receive funds from other sources to 72
support the program. 73
(J) No grant shall be made to any student enrolled in a 74
course of study leading to a degree in theology, religion, or 75

H. B. No. 394 Page 4
As Introduced
other field of preparation for a religious profession unless the 76
course of study leads to an accredited bachelor of arts or 77
bachelor of science degree. 78
(K) Institutions of higher education that enroll students 79
receiving grants under this section shall report to the 80
chancellor the name of each student who has received such a 81
grant but who is no longer eligible for all or part of such 82
grant and shall refund all money due to the state within thirty 83
days after the beginning of the term immediately following the 84
term in which the student was no longer eligible to receive all 85
or part of the grant. There shall be an interest charge of one 86
per cent per month on all money due and payable after such 87
thirty-day period. The chancellor immediately shall notify the 88
office of budget and management and the legislative service 89
commission of all refunds received. 90
(L) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the 91
Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained 92
in a rule adopted under this section is not subject to sections 93
121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. 94
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 95
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 96
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 97
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 98
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 99
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 100
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 101
Section 3. 102
103
1 2 3 4 5

H. B. No. 394 Page 5
As Introduced
A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 235531 Student Choice Grants $0 $95,000,000
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $0 $95,000,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $0 $95,000,000
STUDENT CHOICE GRANTS 104
The foregoing appropriation item 235531, Student Choice 105
Grants, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to 106
support the Student Choice Grant Program pursuant to section 107
3333.27 of the Revised Code. 108
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 109
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 110
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 111
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 112
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 113
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 114
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 115
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 116
of the 136th General Assembly. 117